Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6908XC (2) 91 ss/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 7E.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. Verification of United States citizenship 3 and immigration status. Use the e-verify system of the United 4 States citizenship and immigration services to confirm the 5 employment eligibility of newly hired employees. 6 Sec. 2. Section 10A.101, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 7 following new subsection: 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. âSAVE programâ means the systematic 9 alien verification for entitlements system of the United 10 States department of homeland security and the United States 11 citizenship and immigration services. 12 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 10A.113 SAVE program clearinghouse. 13 There is created within the department a SAVE program 14 clearinghouse, which shall serve as the central entity to 15 process requests to verify, using the SAVE program, the United 16 States citizenship and immigration status of an individual 17 who has applied for a professional license in this state. 18 The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 19 implement this section. 20 Sec. 4. Section 10A.506, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 21 following new subsection: 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 13. a. The licensing and regulation 23 examining boards included in the department pursuant to 24 subsection 1 shall use the SAVE program clearinghouse created 25 within the department pursuant to section 10A.113 to verify 26 the United States citizenship and immigration status of an 27 individual who has applied for a professional license from the 28 board. 29 b. A denial of an application for a professional license due 30 to the results of the SAVE program clearinghouse check shall 31 be appealed to the director and the directorâs decision shall 32 constitute final agency action. 33 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 262.9E Verification of citizenship and 34 immigration status. 35 -1- LSB 6908XC (2) 91 ss/ns 1/ 3 S.F. _____ The state board of regents and each institution of higher 1 education governed by the board shall use the e-verify system 2 of the United States citizenship and immigration services to 3 confirm the employment eligibility of newly hired employees. 4 Sec. 6. Section 272C.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 5 following new subsection: 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 11. âSAVE program clearinghouseâ means 7 the SAVE program clearinghouse created within the department 8 of inspections, appeals, and licensing pursuant to section 9 10A.113. 10 Sec. 7. Section 272C.4, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 11. Use the SAVE program clearinghouse to 13 confirm the United States citizenship and immigration status of 14 an individual who has applied for a professional license from 15 the board. 16 Sec. 8. Section 272C.10, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 17 following new subsection: 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. For a license deemed a professional 19 license by the licensing board, unlawful presence in the United 20 States, as determined by using the SAVE program clearinghouse. 21 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 272C.15A Disqualifications for 22 unlawful presence. 23 A licensing board established after January 1, 1978, and 24 pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall not issue or 25 renew a professional license to an individual who the licensing 26 board is unable to verify is lawfully present in the United 27 States, as determined by using the SAVE program clearinghouse. 28